Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1544
Unlawful destruction of election material; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who, from the time any ballots are cast or voted until the time has expired for using the same as evidence in any contest of an election, unlawfully destroys or attempts to destroy or incites or requests another to destroy any ballot box, list of registered voters, sign-in register, or record of early voters used at any election, unlawfully destroys, falsifies, marks, or writes on any ballot cast or voted, or changes, alters, erases, or tampers with any name contained on any ballot cast or voted shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 443;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 108;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 32.